Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1596
Commissioners; appointment; procedure.

When commissioners are appointed or reappointed by the chief elected official of a city or county, such appointments or reappointments shall be referred to the governing body of such city or county for confirmation or denial by such governing body, and such governing body shall confirm or deny any such appointment or reappointment.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 25.